Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 1. In General

A joint powers board is not a “political subdivision”

such that it would be required to comply with the requirements of article 16 § 7 of the Wyoming Constitution; a joint powers board is a “governmental entity” and therefore the requirements for §

1-39-113

for bringing a claim apply to a joint powers board. Weston County Hosp. Joint Powers Bd. v. Westates Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 841,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1992).

A “governmental entity,” such as a joint powers board, that is formed by a coalition of “political subdivisions” is not another “political subdivision” unless it is an entity of the same kind or class as a county, city, township, town or school district, and it has a prescribed geographic area, a requirement for having officers duly elected by the inhabitants of that area at a public election, and it has a legal power to levy and collect taxes. Weston County Hosp. Joint Powers Bd. v. Westates Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 841,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 16-1-101.
Authority to cooperate.

In exercising, performing or carrying out any power, privilege, authority, duty or function legally vested in any one (1) or more of them by Wyoming law, the state of Wyoming, and any one (1) or more of its counties, municipal corporations, school districts, special districts, public institutions, agencies, boards, commissions and political subdivisions, and any officer or legal representative of any one (1) or more of them, may cooperate with and assist each other, and like entities or authorities of other states, the United States and the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho tribes of the Wind River Indian Reservation. Cooperation may be informal or subject to resolution, ordinance or other appropriate action, and may be embodied in a written agreement specifying purposes, duration, means of financing, methods of operations, termination, acquisition and disposition of property, employment of executive and subordinate agents, reciprocation of governmental immunity protections or other limitations of liability pursuant to W.S. 16-1-104(f) and other appropriate provisions.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.7; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-128; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1995, ch. 47, § 1; 2017 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision on interstate agreements, see U.S. Const., art. 1, § 10.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, inserted “, reciprocation of governmental immunity protections or other limitations of liability pursuant to W.S. 16-1-104(f)” at the end of the paragraph.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence, added “Indian” following “Wind River” and made a stylistic change.

Joint enterprise of county, federal government, legal. —

The joint enterprise of a county and the U.S. forest service to condemn a private road to provide access to a national forest for recreation, the harvesting of timber, and the development and operation of oil and gas leases, did not violate either the Wyoming statutes or the Wyoming constitution. L.U. Sheep Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 790 P.2d 663,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Crow, 2003 WY 40, 65 P.3d 720,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 2003).

§ 16-1-102.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Joint Powers Act”.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.13; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-129; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-1-103(a)(ii).

Wyoming Joint Powers Act is companion act to Wyoming Community Development Act,

§

9-7-101

et seq. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

And joint powers board can borrow from Wyoming community development authority

and pledge loan money to the authority as security for any loan from the latter. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Coping with Expansion: The State as Local Government Financier,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 577 (1975).

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

§ 16-1-103.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Agencies” means Wyoming counties, municipal corporations, school districts, community college districts, the cooperative tribal governing body, the business council of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe, the business council of the Northern Arapaho Tribe, joint powers boards formed pursuant to this act or special districts specifically involved in providing facilities or functions enumerated in W.S. 16-1-104(c);

“This act” means W.S.

16-1-102

through

16-1-110

.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.14; Laws 1975, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-130; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1997, ch. 163, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, § 1; 2005, ch. 84, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to school districts in general, see chapter 3 of title 21.

As to community college districts in general, see art. 3, chapter 18 of title 21.

The 2005 amendment,

in (a)(i), inserted “the business council of the Eastern Shoshone Indian tribe, the business council of the Northern Arapaho Indian tribe.”

Laws 2005, ch. 84, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “16-1-110” for “16-1-109” in (a)(ii).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(i), substituted “cooperative tribal governing body” for “joint business council of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Indian tribes,” deleted “Indian” preceding “Tribe” twice, and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2005, ch. 84, § 3, provides: “The state of Wyoming recognizes members of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Indian tribes are citizens of both their tribal governments and of Wyoming, as well as several of its political subdivisions. Those citizens can best be served if the business councils of both tribes, in addition to the joint business council, are allowed to work cooperatively with the state of Wyoming and the state's political subdivisions.”

§ 16-1-104.
Joint powers, functions and facilities; city-county airport board; eligible senior citizen centers; cooperative public transportation programs.

Any power, privilege or authority exercised or capable of being exercised by an agency may be exercised and enjoyed jointly with any other agency having a similar power, privilege or authority. No cost shall be incurred, debt accrued, nor money expended by any contracting party, which will be in excess of limits prescribed by law. If the cooperative tribal governing body, the business council of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe or the business council of the Northern Arapaho Tribe participates in a joint powers board under this act with political subdivisions and special districts of Wyoming, the powers of the cooperative tribal governing body, the powers of the business council of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe, the powers of the business council of the Northern Arapaho Tribe, Wyoming political subdivisions and Wyoming special districts are neither increased nor decreased by that participation. Rather the participation of the cooperative tribal governing body, the business council of the Eastern Shoshone Tribe or the business council of the Northern Arapaho Tribe is intended to facilitate implementation of programs and projects designed to more effectively benefit Wyoming’s citizens.

A county may enter into and operate under a joint powers agreement with one (1) or more counties, cities, school districts or community college districts for the performance of any function that the county, city, school district or community college district is authorized to perform, except the planning, expansion, creation, financing or operation of municipally owned electrical facilities.

Specifically, without limiting but subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, two (2) or more agencies may jointly plan, own, lease, assign, sell, create, expand, finance and operate:

Water including surface water drainage, sewerage, water and soil conservation or solid waste facilities;

Recreational facilities;

Police protection agency facilities;

Fire protection agency facilities;

Transportation systems facilities, including airports;

Public school facilities;

Community college facilities;

Hospital and related medical facilities;

Courthouse and jail or administrative office facilities;

Public health facilities;

Electrical systems owned by municipalities prior to March 1, 1975;

Rights-of-way for electric transmission systems, oil and natural gas pipelines, telecommunications and utilities. Any right-of-way acquired under the provisions of this subsection shall follow an existing utility corridor whenever practical;

Municipal natural gas facilities and systems.

Any city-county airport board heretofore organized and operating pursuant to W.S.

10-5-101

through

10-5-204

shall be deemed a joint powers board, and shall not be required to reorganize as provided for by W.S. 16-1-106(a) but is subject to all other provisions of this act.

A governing body of an eligible senior citizen center may enter into a joint powers agreement under this act in order to participate in the local government self-insurance program as provided in W.S.

1-42-201

through

1-42-206

. An eligible senior citizen center which enters into a joint powers agreement pursuant to this subsection shall be bound by all provisions of the agreement, but shall not be entitled to participate as a member of the joint powers board.

An agency may enter into an agreement with any governmental entity of another state, as defined in W.S. 1-39-103(a)(viii), for purposes of operating a cooperative public transportation program to transport passengers on one (1) or more routes beginning in, ending in or passing through Wyoming. Any agreement entered into under this subsection shall only apply to the operation of a cooperative public transportation program and shall be conditioned upon the other state extending or agreeing to extend its governmental immunity or other limitations of liability to any governmental entity of Wyoming while operating a cooperative public transportation program. As used in this subsection, “cooperative public transportation program” means a not-for-profit program designed to transport passengers to and from work or to another location on a regularly scheduled basis using vehicles operated by an agency or a governmental entity of another state.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.15; Laws 1975, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-131; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 21, § 2; 1995, ch. 118, § 2; 1997, ch. 180, § 2; 2001, ch. 136, § 1; 2003, ch. 78, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 84, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2017 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to intercity agreement to supply electric power, see §

15-7-202

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (d), substituted “W.S.

10-5-101

through

10-5-204

” for “W.S.

10-4-101

through 10-4-105.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

in (a), inserted references to the business councils of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapahoe Indian tribes.

Laws 2005, ch. 84, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “1-42-206” for “1-42-207” in (e).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (f).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (c)(xiii).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a), in the third sentence, substituted “cooperative tribal governing body” for “joint business council of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Indian tribes,” deleted “Indian” preceding “Tribe” through out the subsection, substituted “cooperative tribal governing body” for “joint business council” and “nor” for “or,” substituted “cooperative tribal governing body” for “joint business council” in the fourth sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2005, ch. 84, § 3, provides: “The state of Wyoming recognizes members of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Indian tribes are citizens of both their tribal governments and of Wyoming, as well as several of its political subdivisions. Those citizens can best be served if the business councils of both tribes, in addition to the joint business council, are allowed to work cooperatively with the state of Wyoming and the state's political subdivisions.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-1-103(a)(ii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

No constitutional prohibition against state subdivisions joining together. —

There is no prohibition in the Wyoming constitution which would preclude the legislature from permitting political subdivisions from joining together, as allowed by this chapter. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Intermunicipal agency to acquire electrical energy constitutional. —

Neither a contract between several municipalities, authorizing an agency organized by them under this chapter to acquire electrical energy and providing, in turn, for its sale to the municipalities, nor the issuance by the agency of revenue bonds, secured by a pledge of payments to be received from the municipalities under the contract, creates a “debt” within the limitation of art. 16, § 4, Wyo. Const., where the contract specifically provides that payments due for electricity sold to each municipality are payable only from the revenues derived from the retail sale of electricity to the customers of the municipal distribution system. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

And agreement between agency and private corporation constitutional. —

Where the participants in an electrical transmission system, including an agency organized by municipalities under this chapter and a private corporation, enter an agreement providing, among other things, for making up deficiencies created by a defaulting participant, but also that a pro rata share of the portion in system entitlements owned by the defaulter should accrue to the benefit of the other participants, such a provision does not conflict with art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const., prohibiting municipalities from lending money or credit to a private entity. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Municipal electric utilities extended same benefits as other utilities. —

The legislature intended to extend liberally to municipal electric utilities the same benefits and efficiency available to other utilities through the combined ownership of a generating system. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Joint powers board can only exercise power, privilege or authority held by participants.

Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Fixed rate formula in power contract reasonable. —

A fixed rate formula agreed upon in a power contract between municipalities organizing an agency under this chapter to produce and distribute electric power to their inhabitants is reasonable. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Extension of police power of municipal corporation beyond territorial limits, 14 ALR2d 103.

§ 16-1-105.
Joint agreements.

Any two (2) or more agencies may enter into agreements with each other for joint or cooperative action pursuant to this act. No agreement hereunder nor amendment thereto is effective until:

The governing body of each participating agency has approved the agreement or amendment;

The agreement or amendment is submitted to and approved by the Wyoming attorney general who shall determine whether the agreement or amendment is compatible with the laws and constitution of Wyoming; and

The agreement or amendment is filed with the keeper of records of each participating agency.

Agreements shall provide:

The duration of the agreement;

The organization, composition and nature of any separate legal entity created and the powers delegated to the entity;

The purpose of the agreement;

The percent ownership of any facility by each participating agency, unless the facility is to be owned by a joint powers board, in which case the agreement shall indicate the interest of each participating agency in the services or product of the joint powers board or the method by which the interest may be determined;

The joint operation and maintenance of any facility unless delegated to an entity pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget therefor;

The partial or complete termination of the agreement, dissolution of any entity provided therein, and distribution of any facilities, improvements or other property upon partial or complete termination of the agreement;

Any other necessary and proper matters.

If the agreement does not establish a separate legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking, the agreement may provide for an administrator or administrative board responsible for administering the joint or cooperative undertaking and representation of participating agencies on any administrative board.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.16; Laws 1976, ch. 28, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-132; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-1-103(a)(ii).

Cited

in

Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs for Sweetwater County, 2005 WY 54,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

, 110 P.3d 875 (2005).

§ 16-1-106.
Joint powers boards; fiscal manager.

An agreement pursuant to this act may create a joint powers board to conduct a joint or cooperative undertaking. A joint powers board shall consist of not fewer than five (5) members, all of whom shall be qualified electors of the counties in which the board operates. Members of a joint powers board shall be appointed by the governing bodies of the participating agencies in any proportion or number the bodies feel would adequately reflect their interest. The initial appointments shall be by mutual agreement with staggered terms of one (1), two (2) and three (3) years and are subject to reappointment. Thereafter, appointments for a full term shall be for three (3) year staggered terms. Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be filled by appointment by the governing bodies of the participating agencies. Members of the board may be removed by the governing bodies of the participating agencies. It is not incompatible office holding for an officer or legal representative of a county, municipal corporation, school district, special district, public institution, agency, board, commission or political subdivision to be a member of a joint powers board.

Promptly following appointment of its members, a joint powers board shall meet, organize and elect from its membership a chairman, vice-chairman, secretary and treasurer. The secretary of a joint powers board shall notify the participating agencies of the board’s organization and shall file a certificate with the county clerk and the secretary of state showing its organization. Upon filing the certificate, the joint powers board shall automatically become a body corporate and politic, and a public corporation with power to sue and be sued. The corporation has perpetual existence unless otherwise specified by the agreement providing for the corporation. No individual member of a joint powers board shall be personally liable for any actions or procedure of a joint powers board. When actually engaged in the performance of their duties, members of a joint powers board shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel and per diem expenses as provided to state employees.

A joint powers board shall meet at least once every three (3) months at the call of the chairman or within five (5) days after an oral or written request of a majority of the board members.

Within the limits of its authorized and available funds, a joint powers board may employ technical, legal, administrative and clerical assistance and engage the services of research and consulting agencies. In the performance of its duties a joint powers board may utilize the services of any officer or employee of a participating agency with the approval of the governing body of the agency. Upon request of a joint powers board elected and appointed officers and employees of participating agencies shall promptly furnish the board information, statistics and reports under their control and shall otherwise cooperate with a joint powers board.

Any agency participating in a joint powers project may appoint a joint powers board created by the agreement or any of the other agencies participating in the project as its agent to manage the project or to manage the finances of the project. The joint powers agreement may create a single fiscal manager to receive monies and make disbursements for the entire project. The fiscal manager may set up any necessary sinking funds, reserve funds or building funds for the use of the project.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.17; Laws 1976, ch. 28, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-133; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 83, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to general powers of corporation, see §

17-16-302

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-1-103(a)(ii).

Operation of electric utility not unconstitutional. —

Because the operation of an electric utility is a proprietary and not a governmental function of a city, there is no unconstitutional delegation of a municipal function to an agency which is organized by authority of this chapter to provide electrical power and energy to the inhabitants of the participating municipalities. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

An agency organized by several municipalities under this chapter to provide electrical power and energy to their inhabitants does not unconstitutionally delegate its power to the electrical transmission system of which it is an owner, as a tenant in common, where under the agreement among the participants in the system, including a private corporation, the private corporation is the project manager during the construction of the generation station and transmission lines, and after construction is the operating agent of the station and related distribution facilities. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Joint powers board is public corporation and the board members are public officers.

Dickerson v. City Council of Buffalo, 582 P.2d 80,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

§ 16-1-107.
Financing of joint projects.

Any joint project consisting of property or improvements or an interest therein to be owned by participating agencies or a joint powers board undertaken pursuant to this act may be financed:

By the contribution of funds from one (1) or more participating agencies which would be available to each agency if proceeding individually;

By bond issues by one (1) or more participating agencies to construct, improve or acquire an interest in any facility in the same manner as bonds may be issued by the agency for its individual construction, improvement or acquisition of such a facility;

By revenue bonds issued by a joint powers board to be repaid solely from revenues provided by this section or any revenue received by a joint powers board from the ownership, lease or operation of property or interest in property owned, leased or controlled by the board. Revenue securities may be issued upon majority approval of the members of a joint powers board and may be executed and delivered at any time, in the form, denominations and amounts, and may be redeemed or repurchased prior to maturity with or without premium, and may bear interest as provided by resolution of a joint powers board authorizing the issue. These securities shall meet the procedural requirements and provisions of W.S.

35-2-425

through

35-2-428

as provided for the issuance of bonds by hospital districts;

By facilities privately owned and leased to two (2) or more agencies or a joint powers board if the lease agreement provides that upon termination of the lease agreement title to the facilities vests in the participating agencies;

By gifts, donations or grants of federal money;

By industrial development project bonds issued pursuant to W.S.

15-1-701

et seq.

The state treasurer with the approval of the governor may if fiscally prudent invest any permanent state funds in bonds or securities issued pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.18; Laws 1976, ch. 28, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-134; Laws 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2001, ch. 136, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to public securities generally, see chapter 5 of this title.

As to investment of state funds generally, see art. 7, chapter 4 of title 9.

As to municipal funding and refunding bonds, see chapter 8 of title 15.

As to county financing generally, see chapter 4 of title 18.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-1-103(a)(ii).

Agreement between agency and private corporation participatingin electric transmission system constitutional. —

Where the participants in an electrical transmission system, including an agency organized by municipalities under this chapter and a private corporation, enter an agreement providing, among other things, for making up deficiencies created by a defaulting participant, but also that a pro rata share of the portion in system entitlements owned by the defaulter should accrue to the benefit of the other participants, such a provision does not conflict with art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const., prohibiting municipalities from lending money or credit to a private entity. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

As is provision requiring securities to meet hospital districtbonding provisions. —

The use of the reference technique in the last sentence of subsection (a)(iii), which provides, “These securities shall meet the procedural requirements and provisions of W.S.

35-2-425

through

35-2-428

as provided for the issuance of bonds by hospital districts,” is not constitutionally objectionable. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Board's majority given exclusive authority to issue bonds.—

The clear language of subsection (a)(iii) indicates that a majority of the agency's joint powers board has been given the exclusive authority to issue revenue bonds at any time. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

And no election is necessary before the issuance of revenue bonds

by an agency and there is no illegality for noncompliance with the Political Subdivision Bond Election Law, §

22-21-101

et seq. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Stated

in

Laramie Citizens for Good Gov't v. City of Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 16-1-108.
Obligations and responsibilities of participating agencies.

No participating agency nor any legal entity created pursuant to this act shall construct, operate or maintain any facility or improvement other than for service to and use by the participating agencies and their resident customers, except for undertakings pursuant to W.S. 16-1-104(c)(xii).

No agreement pursuant to this act shall relieve any participating agency of any obligation or responsibility imposed upon it by law except to the extent of actual and timely performance thereof by a joint powers board or other legal or administrative entity created by an agreement hereunder, the performance may be offered in satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility.

After April 1, 1998, any legal entity created pursuant to this act or any of its participating agencies, which owns, constructs, operates or maintains a municipal or rural domestic water supply system funded in whole or in part by state grants or loans, shall not assess public entities or individual water users in the cooperating agencies’ service area water rate charges which exceed the actual costs of providing and delivering water to the point of connection to the public entities’ or individual water users’ water system. The governing body of the entity may establish one (1) or more service areas in each of which an average water rate may be used for all customers. A one time connection fee or system investment fee reasonably calculated to permit recovery of a proportionate share of the system infrastructure cost necessary to treat and convey the water may also be charged. A one-time fee may also be charged to recover reasonable expenses incurred by the public entity in determining the actual costs of treating and delivering water to the point of connection. Charges for special services such as customer’s line maintenance shall be in addition to the water rate. As used in this subsection, “actual costs of providing and delivering water” shall include a proportionate share of the following costs related to the water system:

Fees, interest charges and principal payments on all bonds issued and other indebtedness incurred to construct, purchase or improve the utility;

Salaries and wages of employees;

The cost of materials, supplies, utilities and outside services;

Other costs directly related to the delivery system;

The cost for providing and maintaining a depreciation fund, a fund for emergencies and a fund for acquisition and development of new water rights and water sources;

Administrative and overhead expenses; and

The cost of acquiring, transporting, processing and treating water.

If requested by the party seeking water service who resides outside the public entity’s service area and upon approval of the public entity, subsection (c) of this section shall not apply if the ratio of the established rate charged to customers outside the area to the rate within the public entities service area is less than one and one-quarter (1.25) to one (1).

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-18.19; Laws 1976, ch. 28, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-135; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1998, ch. 118, § 1; 1999, ch. 88, § 1; 2001, ch. 136, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

deleted “and” at the end of (c)(v).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1999, ch. 88, § 2, provides: “Nothing in this act shall prohibit a municipality, joint powers board or other entity from providing water below cost.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-1-103(a)(ii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Legislature intended a liberal, not a stingy, interpretation of this chapter.

Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Subsection (a) does not prevent sale of surplus electrical power by joint agency.

Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).